District of Columbia statutes.
27-105

Jurisdiction.

A suit for damages and penalties may be brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

May 16, 1992, D.C. Law 9-98, § 6, 39 DCR 678

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-445.

Temporary Addition of Section

See note to § 27-101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-110, November 25, 1991, 38 DCR 7304).
For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-155, February 21, 1992, 39 DCR 1354).